Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1224.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3(a)(1) of the act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the Pharmacy Act, is amended to read:Section 3. Licensing of Pharmacists.--(a) The State Board of Pharmacy may license as a pharmacist any person who has filed an application therefor, subscribed by the person under oath or affirmation, containing such information as the board may by regulation require, and who--(1) Is not less than twenty-one years of age [and is a citizen of the United States];* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617181920